Delaware, session 153, SB66.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF DELAWARE: Section 1. Amend Â§ 4121, Title 11 of the Delaware Code by making deletions as shown by strike through and insertions as shown by underline as follows: Â§ 4121. Community notification of sex offenders on probation, parole, conditionalÂ release Â release,Â or release from confinement. (a)Â When Â As Â used in this subchapter: (1) âCommunity notificationâ means notice which that includes, to the extent possible, all information required to be included in the searchable records available to the public under paragraph (a)(3) of this section and that Â is provided by any method devised specifically to notify members of the public who are likely to encounter a sexÂ offender. Methods of notification may include, but not be limited to, Â include door-to-door appearances, mail, electronic mail, e-mail, telephone,Â fax, newspapers orÂ notices,Â or any combination thereof of methods to schools, licensed day care facilities, public libraries, any other organization, company or individual upon request, and other accessible public facilities within the community. âCommunity notificationâ also includes notice provided through an alert system added to the Delaware State Police Sex Offender Central Registry Internet Web Site website that allows governmental agencies, agencies; public officials (such such as county or municipal Executives, Mayors, Commissioners, or Council Members), executives, mayors, commissioners, or council members; and members of the general public to register to receive updates by geographical region whenever a sex offender is added to, deleted from, or has any change in status on the registry created pursuant to Â§â4120 of this title. Community notification shall include where possible all information required to be included in the searchable records pursuant to paragraph (a)(3) of this section. (3) a. Â âSearchable records available to the publicâ means records regarding every sex offender who has been convicted and Â who is thereafter Â designated to Risk Assessment Tier II or IIIÂ pursuant to Â under Â this section.Â Such b. The searchable Â recordsÂ shall also Â available to the publicÂ must Â includeÂ the Â all of the following information: 1. The Â last verified addresses for theÂ offender, and shall identifyÂ the Â sex offender. 2. The Â specific sex offense or offenses for of which the sex offender wasÂ convicted, the Â convicted. 3. The Â dateÂ or datesÂ ofÂ theÂ convictions and all Â of eachÂ conviction. 4.Â All Â informationÂ required for registrationÂ pursuant to Â under Â Â§â4120(d)(2) of this title as is practicable given the method of community notification, except that notification. But the sex offenderâs relationship to the victimÂ shall Â may Â not be a included in the searchable record Â records available to theÂ public Â andÂ ageÂ ofÂ the Â victimÂ shall Â may Â be searchableÂ only by age ranges birth to 11 years, 12 to 15 years, 16 to 17 years, and 18Â years Â andÂ above. Â older. c. Â TheÂ searchable Â recordsÂ available to the public Â may also include other information designated for public access by the Superintendent of the Delaware State Police.Â Exempt from the But the searchable Â recordsÂ are Â available to theÂ publicÂ must not include Â the identity of the victims, the Social Security number of the offender, and arrests thatÂ did Â do Â not result in conviction. d. Â TheÂ public access Â searchable Â recordsÂ shall Â available to the publicÂ must Â includeÂ a warning thatÂ information should not be usedÂ to unlawfully injure, harass, or commit a crime against any individual named in the registry or residing or working at any reportedÂ address. The warningÂ shall Â must Â note that any such actionÂ could result in civil or criminal penalties.Â These e. TheÂ searchable Â recordsÂ shall Â available to the publicÂ must Â be searchable by the name of the sex offender, by suitable geographic criteria, and by as many other required data elements as is technically feasible.Â These f. TheÂ searchable Â recordsÂ shall Â available to the publicÂ must Â beÂ madeÂ available upon request throughÂ police agencies, public libraries, publicÂ schools Â police agencies Â andÂ theÂ Internet. The records shall be maintained by theÂ Delaware State Police Sex OffenderÂ CentralÂ RegistryÂ website. g. The Â Superintendent of the Delaware StateÂ Police, Â as set forth in Â shallÂ maintain the searchable records available to the public as required by this section and Â§ 4120 of thisÂ title, and elsewhere in this section. Â Â They shall Â title. The records must Â be updated as often as practicable, but not less than every 3 months. (e) (1)Â Any person designated as a sex offender who is required to register pursuant to under this section who is required to register shall comply with the registration provisions of Â§Â 4120 of this title as follows: (i) When Whenever a sex offender assigned to Risk Assessment Tier II or III provides registration informationÂ as provided by under Â§â4120 of this title, the chief law-enforcement officer of the local jurisdiction where the offender intends to reside, or the Superintendent of the State Police if no local police agency exists, shall provide public notification as follows: (1) For sex offenders assigned to Risk Assessment Tier II, notificationÂ shall Â must Â consist of searchable records available to the public, and may also consist of community notificationÂ pursuant to under Â paragraphÂ (l)(3) Â ( l )(3) Â of thisÂ section; or Â section. (2) For sex offenders assigned to Risk Assessment Tier III, notificationÂ shall Â must Â consist of searchable records available to the publicÂ as well as Â and Â community notification. (3) For sex offenders assigned to Tier II or III, noticeÂ shall Â must Â be given to any school the offender plans to attendÂ and/or Â and Â to the chief law-enforcement officer of the local jurisdiction where the offender plans to study or be employed. (l) (1) Â ( l )(1) Â All elected public officials, public employees employees and public agencies are immune from civil liability for any discretionary decision to release relevant information unless it is shown that the official, employee employee, or agency acted with gross negligence or in bad faith. The immunity provided under this section applies to the release of relevant information to other employees, officials officials, or public agencies as well as to agencies, and the general public. (t) (1) If a school, school district or licensed child care provider receives community notification,Â theÂ community notification must be placed in a binder and kept in the administrative officeÂ available toÂ view upon requestÂ by adults andÂ juveniles with adult supervision.Â No community notification may be removed from the binder unless the school or child care provider is notified of an address change informing them that the offender has moved from the community.Â The school, school district or licensed child care provider shall notify parents and staff frequently through their regular communications of the availability and location of theÂ community notification binder. Â (t)(1)a.Â For purposes of this paragraph (t)(1), âschool and child care notificationâ means notice of all of the following information: 1. That searchable records available to the public can be obtained online at the Delaware State Police Sex OffenderÂ CentralÂ RegistryÂ website or in-person at a Delaware State Police troop or the Delaware State Bureau of Identification. 2.Â That the public can register to receive community notifications through the Delaware State Police Sex Offender Central Registry website. 3. TheÂ Uniform Resource Locator addressÂ ofÂ the Delaware State Police Sex OffenderÂ CentralÂ RegistryÂ website. b. A school, school district, and licensed child care provider shall provide school and child care notification as follows: 1. By posting the school and child care notification on its website if the school, school district, or licensed child care provider has a website. 2. By sending the school and child care notification to faculty, staff, and a parent or guardian of an enrolled child in writing at least annually if the school, school district, or licensed child care provider does not have a website. 3. By providing the school and child care notification to staff, faculty, orÂ a parent or guardian of an enrolled child upon a request for sex offender registry information. SYNOPSIS Beginning in 2002, schools, school districts, and licensed child care providers have been required to keep binders of community notifications with information about registered sex offenders. This requirement was enacted based on recommendation from the Community Notification Task Force that schools have a role in community awareness. However, this requirement has created financial, administrative, and emotional burdens for staff who maintain the binders. The binders are rarely reviewed by the public and they do not necessarily provide up-to-date information or information on sex offenders in the immediate geographic area of the school, school district, or licensed child care provider. Additionally, in its March 31, 2002, report, the Community Notification School Task Force found that schools do not have the expertise to answer inevitable questions regarding the nature of particular offenses or the risk posed by particular offenders, and that it is not an appropriate role for educators to answer those questions. This Act eliminates the requirement that a school, school district, or licensed child care provider keep community notifications in a binder. Instead, schools, school district, or licensed child care providers are required to provide âschool and child care notificationâ that includes all of the following information: 1. Notification that searchable records available to the public can be obtained at a police agency or the Delaware State Bureau of Identification (âSBIâ). 2. Notification that the public can register for community notifications on the Delaware Sex Offender Central Registry website. 3. The URL for the Delaware Sex Offender Central Registry website. The school, school district, or licensed child care provider must provide the school and child care notification upon request from staff, faculty, or a parent or guardian of an enrolled child. Additionally, the school, school district, or licensed child care provider must post the school and child care notification on its website or, if it does not have website, the school, school district, or licensed child care provider must send the information to staff, faculty, and a legal parent or guardian of an enrolled child in writing at least annually. The Act also clarifies that sex offender registry information must be available on the Internet on the Delaware Sex Offender Central Registry website. Federal Sex Offender Registration and Notification Act (âSORNAâ) guidelines require law enforcement to keep a registry of sex offenders and to provide public notification. Specifically, the guidelines require law enforcement to notify schools, but do not require schools to provide access to sex offender records. Instead, federal law enacted in 2006, 34 U.S.C. Â§ 20920, requires states to provide public access to sex offender registry information on the Internet. The SBI maintains the Delaware Sex Offender Central Registry on its website, which allows the general public to find information about registered sex offenders by searching the offenderâs information or by searching in a geographic radius. The website also allows the public to sign up for e-mail notifications regarding sex offenders who appear on the website. The website is updated every Friday. It is easily accessible to most of the public, including on computers at public libraries. Additionally, the public can request sex offender registry information in-person at a Delaware State Police troop. The public also can call the SBI for information. Certain municipal police agencies, such as the City of Dover Police Department and the Newark Delaware Police Department, also provide access to community notifications for offenders located in the municipality on the agencyâs website. Law-enforcement agencies are better equipped than schools or licensed childcare providers to answer questions about the registry. This Act also makes technical corrections to conform existing law to the standards of the Delaware Legislative Drafting Manual. Author: Senator Sokola